Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1206
Continuance; how granted.

Applications for continuances shall be made in accordance with section 25-1148, but in criminal cases in the district court the court shall grant a continuance only upon a showing of good cause and only for so long as is necessary, taking into account not only the request or consent of the prosecution or defense, but also the public interest in prompt disposition of the case.

Laws 1971, LB 436, § 2.

This section and section 25-1148 do not define whether a defendant's right to a speedy trial has been violated. State v. Turner, 252 Neb. 620, 564 N.W.2d 231 (1997).

A trial court may, in a proper case, order a continuance on its own motion and in the absence of a showing of abuse of discretion, its ruling on a motion for a continuance will not be disturbed on appeal. State v. Lee, 195 Neb. 348, 237 N.W.2d 880 (1976).

A defendant in a criminal case may not discharge his counsel on the eve of trial and obtain a continuance without demonstrating good cause therefor. State v. Coleman, 190 Neb. 441, 208 N.W.2d 690 (1973).

To support a continuance of trial for good cause beyond six months from filing of information, the court must make specific findings, based upon substantial preponderance of evidence, as to the cause or causes of such extension and the period of extension attributable to such cause or causes. State v. Brown, 189 Neb. 297, 202 N.W.2d 585 (1972); State v. Alvarez, 189 Neb. 281, 202 N.W.2d 604 (1972).